Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 6. ROADWAYS

SUBTITLE G. TURNPIKES AND TOLL PROJECTS

Text of chapter as repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 23.003 effective September 1, 2009

CHAPTER 361. STATE HIGHWAY TURNPIKE PROJECTS

SUBCHAPTER G. USE OF TURNPIKE PROJECTS

SUBCHAPTER I. PARTICIPATION IN TURNPIKE PROJECTS